Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There are  appropriated to the Oregon Department of Emergency Manage-
ment, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, out of the General  Fund, the following
amounts, for the following purposes:
(1) Administration.......................... $ 17,541,872
(2) Preparedness and Response ...... $ 3,957,006
(3) Mitigation and Recovery ........... $ 444,261
(4) Debt Service.............................. $ 4,841,640
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limits for  payment
of expenses  from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal  funds, collected or received by the Oregon Department of
Emergency Management, for the following purposes:
(1) Administration.......................... $ 876,477
(2) 911 Emergency Program ........... $143,506,162
(3) Preparedness and Response ...... $ 9,078,919
(4) Mitigation and Recovery ........... $ 25,925,466
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the  biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment
of expenses from  federal funds collected or received by the Oregon Department of Emer-
gency Management, for the following purposes:
(1) Administration.......................... $ 794,874
(2) Preparedness and Response ...... $ 56,539,457
(3) Mitigation and Recovery ........... $995,197,749
SECTION 4. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2023 Act takes effect
July 1, 2023.
Enrolled House Bill 5017 (HB 5017-A) Page 1
Passed by House June 7, 2023
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 23, 2023
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5017 (HB 5017-A) Page 2